Hawaii, session 2026, SB2256.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Ira Barnes Dutton was born on April 27, 1843, in Stowe, Vermont, and spent his formative years in Janesville, Wisconsin.  In September of 1861, during the beginning of the Civil War, Ira Barnes Dutton enlisted in the Union Army as part of Company B of the thirteenth Wisconsin infantry.  Ira Barnes Dutton was subsequently discharged in 1866 due to a downsizing of the military after the Civil War.  Following the Civil War, Ira Barnes Dutton suffered from a failed marriage, alcoholism, probable post-traumatic stress disorder, and other personal problems, leading him on a journey to seek atonement through Catholicism.  During this time, Ira Barnes Dutton was baptized and adopted the name of his favorite saint, Joseph. The legislature recognizes that, upon learning about the work of Father Damien on Molokai, Joseph Dutton made his way to Hawaii. Arriving at Kalaupapa in July of 1886, Joseph Dutton assisted Father Damien, who had been diagnosed with leprosy. Joseph Dutton quickly became an expert in caring for patients while working alongside Father Damien, who affectionately called Joseph Dutton "Brother".  After Father Damien's death three years later in 1889, Joseph Dutton managed the Baldwin Home for Boys for leprosy victims and dedicated the remainder of his life to the residents of Kalaupapa until becoming ill. Joseph Dutton was then transferred to St. Francis Hospital in Honolulu, where he passed away on March 26, 1931. The legislature further finds that in 1929, the Hawaii territorial house of representatives acknowledged the work of Brother Joseph Dutton and passed House Resolution No. 7, which read, in part, "this House desires to put on record its appreciation of the great and inspiring service and influence for good, for the splendid and effective service he has rendered in their behalf and for the work done during the past 40 years by Brother Joseph Dutton in the Settlement of Molokai in his ministration to the afflicted in Kalawao and Kalaupapa; and that the thanks of the House of representatives be extended to him in his memorial". The legislature notes that the State officially recognizes Saint Damien de Veuster Day every May 10; Saint Marianne Cope Day every January 23; and Kalaupapa Month every January.  The legislature believes that similar recognition should be accorded to Brother Joseph Dutton. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to honor the hard work and dedication of Brother Joseph Dutton in helping residents of Kalaupapa by establishing April 27 of each year as Brother Joseph Dutton Day. SECTION 2.  Chapter 8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§8-     Brother Joseph Dutton Day.  April 27 of each year shall be known and designated as "Brother Joseph Dutton Day".  This day is not and shall not be construed to be a state holiday." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________